California, session 20252026, AB26.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that holds elected officials accountable by prohibiting Members of the Legislature from accepting gifts or trading in individual stock, imposing a lifetime lobbying ban, eliminating exemptions for the Legislature from labor, workplace, and public record laws, and eliminating government pensions for local elected officials.